Nebraska, session 109, LB336.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB336 LB336
2025 2025
Section 1. The Task Force on Supported Employment is created. The
task force shall study the (1) barriers to supporting individuals with
intellectual and developmental disabilities in attaining and maintaining
competitive integrated employment and (2) employment opportunities
available to such individuals. The task force shall provide
recommendations to the Legislature, the Governor, and state agencies.
Sec. 2. (1) The Task Force on Supported Employment shall consist of
the following voting members who shall be appointed no later than
September 1, 2025:
(a) A representative of the Governor's office appointed by the
Governor;
(b) The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and
Human Services or designee;
(c) The executive director of the Nebraska Council on Developmental
Disabilities or designee;
(d) Two service providers with eight or more years of experience and
a high success rate in delivering supported employment to individuals
with a broad range of disabilities appointed by the Governor;
(e) A representative of a chamber of commerce appointed by the
Governor;
(f) Two self-advocates with at least five years of experience in
supported employment appointed by the Governor;
(g) A certified community work incentives coordinator or community
partner work incentives counselor appointed by the Governor;
(h) A special education transition coordinator appointed by the
Commissioner of Education;
(i) A representative of a Nebraska organization, established as part
of the national protection and advocacy system, that advocates for the
rights of individuals with disabilities appointed by the Governor; and
(j) A representative of a statewide disability organization with
recorded members in at least ten counties appointed by the Governor.
-2-

LB336 LB336
2025 2025
(2) The task force shall consist of the following nonvoting members:
(a) The chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of
the Legislature or designee;
(b) The chairperson of the Business and Labor Committee of the
Legislature or designee;
(c) A representative from the University Center for Excellence in
Developmental Disability Education, Research and Service of the Munroe-
Meyer Institute at the University of Nebraska Medical Center appointed by
the Governor;
(d) An employee of the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation of the
State Department of Education appointed by the Commissioner of Education;
(e) An employee of the Division of Developmental Disabilities of the
Department of Health and Human Services appointed by the Governor;
(f) An employee of the Division of Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services appointed by the Governor;
(g) An employee of the Department of Labor appointed by the
Governor;
(h) A supported employment expert who has assisted in other states
appointed by the Governor; and
(i) An employee of the State Treasurer carrying out the achieving a
better life experience program under section 77-1402 appointed by the
State Treasurer.
Sec. 3. The voting members of the Task Force on Supported
Employment shall elect a chairperson. Seven voting members shall
constitute a quorum.
Sec. 4. The Task Force on Supported Employment shall:
(1) Review the 2023 report "Necessity or Luxury?" prepared for the
Nebraska Council on Developmental Disabilities and the Nebraska 2023
Supported Employment Action Plan and provide tangible solutions to
fulfill the recommendations;
(2) Review the recommendations resulting from the evaluation
-3-

LB336 LB336
2025 2025
required by section 83-1228; and
(3) Create a report with an action plan that provides tangible
solutions to fulfill the recommendations of the report, action plan, and
evaluation described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section, for the
executive branch of state government, relevant state agencies, the
Legislature, and businesses. The report and action plan shall include,
but not be limited to, the:
(a) Barriers to entry into the workforce for individuals with
intellectual and developmental disabilities;
(b) Untapped workforce potential for individuals with intellectual
and developmental disabilities;
(c) Number of individuals that would be able to join the workforce
with the implementation of the action plan;
(d) Ways in which additional working hours typically impact the
benefits received by individuals with intellectual and developmental
disabilities; and
(e) Ways in which any negative impact in benefit eligibility or
benefit reduction can be minimized by the state.
Sec. 5. The Task Force on Supported Employment shall electronically
submit a report to the Legislature and Governor no later than July 1,
2027.
Sec. 6. The Task Force on Supported Employment shall terminate on
December 31, 2027.
-4-